Washington statutes.
RCW 18.27.120

List of registered contractors—Availability, fee.

(1) The department shall compile a list of all contractors registered under this chapter and update the list at least bimonthly. The list shall be considered as public record information and shall be available to the public upon request: PROVIDED, That the department may charge a reasonable fee under RCW 42.56.120.

(2) The department shall inform any person, firm, or corporation, if a contractor is registered, and if a contractor is bonded or insured, without charge except for a reasonable fee under RCW 42.56.120 for copies made.

[ 2005 c 274 s 221; 1983 1st ex.s. c 2 s 20; 1973 1st ex.s. c 153 s 7; 1972 ex.s. c 118 s 5.]

NOTES:

Fees, generally: RCW 18.27.070.